Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-221
Power to fine. In addition to
or in lieu of the suspension, revocation, or refusal to extend any certificate
of authority, the commissioner, after hearing, may levy a fine upon the insurer
in an amount not less than $500 and not more than $50,000. The order levying
the fine shall specify the period within which the fine shall be fully paid,
which shall not be less than thirty nor more than forty-five days from the date
of the order. Upon failure to pay the fine when due, the commissioner shall
revoke the insurer's certificate of authority if not already revoked, and the
fine shall be recovered in a civil action brought on behalf of the commissioner
by the attorney general. Any fine so collected shall be paid by the
commissioner to the director of finance for the account of the compliance
resolution fund. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 163, §15(1); am
L 2002, c 39, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next